New Jersey, session 221, A294.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.  There is established, in but not of the Department of Human Services, the "Commission on People with Disabilities." b.   The commission shall consist of 25 members. (1)  Thirteen voting members are to be appointed to the commission as follows: (a)   seven members to be appointed by the Governor with at least three members who are persons with disabilities; (b)  three members to be appointed by the President of the Senate with at least two members who are persons with disabilities; and (c)   three members to be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly with at least two members who are persons with disabilities. (2)  The following 12 non-voting, ex-officio members, or their designees are to be appointed to the commission: the Commissioners of Human Services, Health, Military and Veterans Affairs, Community Affairs, Education, Labor and Workforce Development, the Chairman of the New Jersey State Employment and Training Commission, the Secretary of Higher Education, the Attorney General, the Ombudsman for Individuals with Intellectual or Developmental Disabilities and their Families, the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, and Executive Director of Disability Rights New Jersey. c.   Any vacancy in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. d.   Members of the commission shall be appointed within 30 days after the effective date of this act, and shall hold their initial organizational meeting as soon as practicable, but no later than 30 days following appointment of a majority of its authorized membership.  At the initial organizational meeting, the members shall elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among the members of the commission by a majority vote of the members present. e.   Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. f.    A majority of all the authorized members of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and no action of the commission shall be taken without the affirmative vote of a majority of all the authorized members of the commission, except for the election of the chairperson and vice-chairperson at the initial organizational meeting pursuant to subsection d. of this section. g.    The Department of Human Services shall provide primary staff support to the commission. 2.   a. The purpose of the Commission on People with Disabilities shall be to: (1)  suggest policies, procedures, regulations, and legislation that help people with disabilities in New Jersey; (2)  serve as the point-of-contact between the Governor, the Legislature, people with disabilities, and those providers who serve people with disabilities in order to ensure that the State government is responsive to the needs of people with disabilities; (3)  work with State departments, commissions, offices, agencies, and providers to ensure that the needs of people with disabilities are met regarding services and programs that are available to those individuals; and (4)  work with State departments, commissions, offices, and agencies which oversee the hiring and employment of people with disabilities in the State to ensure that no discrimination takes place. b.   The commission shall prepare an annual report on its findings, conclusions, and recommendations and shall submit the report to the Governor and to the Legislature, in accordance with the requirements of section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). 3.   This act shall take effect immediately.